Massachusetts, session 194th, H4024.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) The department of public health shall study mold and mold spores in multi-unit
dwellings in the commonwealth. The study shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the possibility
of completely eliminating mold and mold spores in multi-unit dwellings; (ii) focusing on the
cause and presence of excess moisture that allows mold to grow in multi-unit dwellings; and (iii)
analysis of other states and their laws that establishes standards on what amount or type of mold
is dangerous.
(b) The department shall hold at least 1 public hearing as part of its study.
(c) The department shall submit a report detailing the results of the study, along with
recommendations and any proposed standards and legislation necessary to carry out its
recommendations, to the: (i) the joint committee on public health; (ii) the house and senate
committees on ways and means; and (iii) clerks of the house of representatives and senate not
later than December 31, 2026.
of 1